Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1705
Enforcement; penalty.

The Attorney General shall enforce the Parental Rights in Social Media Act and may impose a penalty of up to two thousand five hundred dollars per violation. All penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2025, LB383, § 30.
July 1, 2026